Washington statutes.
RCW 11.110.100

Investigations by attorney general authorized—Appearance and production of books, papers, documents, etc., may be required.

The attorney general may investigate transactions and relationships of trustees and other persons subject to this chapter for the purpose of determining whether the trust or other relationship is administered according to law and the terms and purposes of the trust, or to determine compliance with this chapter in any other respect. He or she may require any officer, agent, trustee, fiduciary, beneficiary, or other person, to appear, at a time and place designated by the attorney general in the county where the person resides or is found, to give information under oath and to produce books, memoranda, papers, documents of title, and evidence of assets, liabilities, receipts, or disbursements in the possession or control of the person ordered to appear.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2093; 1985 c 30 s 123. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 53 s 10. Formerly RCW 19.10.100.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.